Hawaii statutes.
[§291C-199] Clinging to vehicles, bicycles,
etc. No person driving a moped shall attach oneself or the moped to any
other vehicle, nor permit the rider of a bicycle, coaster, sled, or toy vehicle
or any person on roller skates to be or become attached to the moped or the
driver. [L 1978, c 175, pt of §15; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next